Utah statutes.
10-8-14.5.   Utility easements -- Use for water or sewerage service.
(1)  If a municipality grants a general utility easement for the provision of
electric, gas, or telephone service, the grant may also provide that the
easement may be used by the corporation or other entity that provides water or
sewerage service to the municipality's residents.
(2)  A general utility easement described in Subsection (1) is subject to the
provisions imposed on a public utility easement under Section 54-3-27.
(3)  If a municipality acquires a utility easement through the exercise of its
eminent domain power for use under this section, the owner of the servient
estate may realign the easement at the servient estate owner's expense unless
the alignment cannot be reasonably changed because of engineering or safety
requirements.
